Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 75. Interchange of Service Between Telegraph and Telephone Companies

§ 2701.
Transfer of messages and interchange of service.

Whenever the Commission, after a hearing had upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that a physical connection can reasonably be made between the lines of two or more telephone companies or two or more telegraph companies whose lines can be made to form a continuous line of communication, by the construction and maintenance of suitable connections, for the transfer of messages or conversations, and that public convenience and necessity will be subserved thereby, or finds that two or more telegraph or telephone companies have failed to establish joint rates, tolls, or charges for service by or over their lines, and that joint rates, tolls, or charges ought to be established, the Commission may, by its order, (a) require that the connection be made, except where the purpose of the connection is primarily to secure the transmission of local messages or conversations between points within the same city or town, and that conversations be transmitted and messages transferred over the connection under such rules and regulations as the Commission may establish, and (b) may prescribe through lines and joint rates, tolls, and charges to be made and to be used, observed, and enforced in the future. If the telephone or telegraph companies do not agree upon the division of the joint rates, tolls, or charges established by the Commission over the through lines, the Commission may, after further hearing, establish the division by supplemental order.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 180

, § 2.

§ 2702.
Repealed. 1995, No. 99 (Adj. Sess.), § 16(2).

§ 2703.
Telephone service.

On application of a telegraph or telephone company and upon reasonable terms, a person or corporation owning, controlling, or operating a telephone exchange or service in this State shall furnish such applicant with the use of a telephone or telephones, and telephonic service and connection with the respective exchanges and the subscribers thereto, without discriminating between telegraph or telephone companies as to the connection, service, or use of instruments furnished or charges made.

§ 2704.
Discrimination prohibited.

On application of a person or corporation and tender of the charges or rental sum usual or customary for the class of service required, without discrimination for the same class of service rendered, a person or corporation owning, controlling, or operating a telephone exchange or service in this State shall furnish the applicant with the use of a telephone and telephonic service and connection with their respective exchanges and subscribers thereto.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 180

, § 3.

§ 2705.
Repealed. 1995, No. 99 (Adj. Sess.), § 16(3).

§ 2706.
Transmission of telephone messages.

A person owning, hiring, or leasing a telephone shall have the right to transmit by telephone to any telegraph company using a telephone, a message to be forwarded by telegraph, and also the right to receive from such telegraph company over such telephone wires, messages received by telegraph for such individual.